Utah statutes.
48-2c-1213 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Decree of dissolution.

(1)  If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in Section 48-2c-1210 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the company and specifying the effective date of the dissolution.  The clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the division for filing and shall mail a copy of the decree to the registered agent of the company or to the division if it has no registered agent of record.

(2)  After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the company's business and affairs in accordance with Part 13.

(3)  The court's order may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

